Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1914
Board; members; qualifications; terms; meetings.

The board shall consist of four medical radiographers and one limited radiographer. Of the first four medical radiographers appointed, one shall be appointed for a term of one year, one shall be appointed for a term of two years, one shall be appointed for a term of three years, and one shall be appointed for a term of four years. The first limited radiographer shall be appointed for a term of five years. Thereafter each appointment shall be for a term of five years. The board shall meet at least two times per calendar year.

Laws 2005, LB 453, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-3512;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 652.